Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 9. Contempt

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Lack of notice to contemnor at time of contemptuous conduct of possible criminal contempt sanctions as affecting prosecution for contempt in federal court, 76 ALR Fed 797.

§ 1-21-901.
Grounds.

A circuit court judge may punish for contempt in the following cases and no others:

Persons guilty of disorderly, contemptuous and insolent behavior toward a judge engaged in any judicial proceeding, which tends to interrupt such proceedings or impair the respect due the judge’s authority;

Persons guilty of resistance or disobedience to any lawful order or process made or issued by the judge.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 174; R.S. 1887, § 3590; R.S. 1899, § 4500; C.S. 1910, § 5364; C.S. 1920, § 6637; R.S. 1931, § 62-2201; C.S. 1945, § 14-1601; W.S. 1957, § 1-668; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-901; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

throughout (a), substituted “circuit court judge” for “justice of the peace” and “judge” or a variant for “justice” or a variant.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Order not lawful.—

Trial court erred in ruling that the public defender had to accept all appointments to serve as counsel for indigent defendants unless and until the appointing court ruled otherwise, and therefore its order holding the state public defender in contempt for declining two appointments based on the unavailability of counsel was reversed, because this section afforded the public defender discretion to decline an appointment or appointments. The court further held that in exercising that discretion, there was no requirement, statutory or otherwise, that the public defender show an individualized injury in fact or meet the Strickland post-conviction showing of prejudice. Lozano v. Circuit Court of the Sixth Judicial Dist., 2020 WY 44, 460 P.3d 721,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2020).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Contempt for violation of compromise and settlement the terms of which were approved by court but not incorporated in court order, decree or judgment, 84 ALR3d 1047.

State court's power to order indefinite coercive fine or imprisonment to exact promise of future compliance with court's order — anticipatory contempt, 81 ALR4th 1008.

Profane or obscene language by party, witness or observer during trial proceedings as basis for contempt citation, 29 ALR5th 702.

§ 1-21-902.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005,
ch. 90, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 175, related to punishment for contempt.

Laws 2005, ch. 90, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

§ 1-21-903.
Hearing
required; warrant of attachment.

No person shall be punished
for contempt before a circuit court judge until after an opportunity
to be heard and for that purpose the judge may issue his warrant of
attachment to bring the offender before him.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 176; R.S. 1887, § 3592; R.S. 1899, § 4502; C.S. 1910, § 5366; C.S. 1920, § 6639; R.S. 1931, § 62-2203; C.S. 1945, § 14-1603; W.S. 1957, § 1-670; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-903; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court judge” for “justice,” and “judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-904.
Summary
proceedings if offender present.

If the offender is present
he may be summarily arraigned by the circuit court judge and proceeded
against as if a warrant had been previously issued and the offender
arrested thereon.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 177; R.S. 1887, § 3593; R.S. 1899, § 4503; C.S. 1910, § 5367; C.S. 1920, § 6640; R.S. 1931, § 62-2204; C.S. 1945, § 14-1604; W.S. 1957, § 1-671; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-904; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court judge” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-905.
Warrant of commitment.

The warrant of commitment
for contempt must set forth the particular circumstances of the offense
or it is void.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 178; R.S. 1887, § 3594; R.S. 1899, § 4504; C.S. 1910, § 5368; C.S. 1920, § 6641; R.S. 1931, § 62-2205; C.S. 1945, § 14-1605; W.S. 1957, § 1-672; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-905.

Applied

in

Badley v. City of Sheridan, 440 P.2d 516,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1968).

§ 1-21-906.
Commitment
of witness; generally.

Any witness attending
before a circuit court who refuses to be sworn in some form prescribed
by law or to answer any pertinent or proper question, may by order
be committed to the jail of the county.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 179; R.S. 1887, § 3595; R.S. 1899, § 4505; C.S. 1910, § 5369; C.S. 1920, § 6642; R.S. 1931, § 62-2206; C.S. 1945, § 14-1606; W.S. 1957, § 1-673; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-906; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to form of oath, see §

1-2-101

.

As to affirmation in lieu of oath, see §

1-2-103

.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice of the peace.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42,§ 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-907.
Commitment of witness; order.

The order shall specify
the cause for which the order was issued. If it is for refusing to
answer any question, the question shall be specified. The witness
shall be closely confined pursuant to the order until he is sworn
or answers.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 180; R.S. 1887, § 3596; R.S. 1899, § 4506; C.S. 1910, § 5370; C.S. 1920, § 6643; R.S. 1931, § 62-2207; C.S. 1945, § 14-1607; W.S. 1957, § 1-674; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-907.

§ 1-21-908.
Commitment
of witness; adjournment.

The circuit court shall
adjourn the case at the request of either party for a reasonable time
or until the witness testifies in the case.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 181; R.S. 1887, § 3597; R.S. 1899, § 4507; C.S. 1910, § 5371; C.S. 1920, § 6644; R.S. 1931, § 62-2208; C.S. 1945, § 14-1608; W.S. 1957, § 1-675; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-908; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court” for “justice.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 1-21-909.
Failure of witness to attend.

If any person subpoenaed
as a witness fails to attend, he is guilty of contempt and shall be
fined all the costs for his apprehension unless he shows reasonable
cause for his failure to attend, in which case the party requiring
the appearance shall pay the costs.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 182; R.S. 1887, § 3598; R.S. 1899, § 4508; C.S. 1910, § 5372; C.S. 1920, § 6645; R.S. 1931, § 62-2209; C.S. 1945, § 14-1609; W.S. 1957, § 1-676; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-22-909.